Utah statutes.
39-6-23.   Military court -- Charges and specifications -- Contents --
Notification of accused.
(1)  Charges and specifications shall be signed by a person subject to this
chapter under oath before a person authorized to administer oaths and shall
state that:
(a)  the person signing has personal knowledge of, or has investigated, the
matters set forth in the document; and
(b)  the matters set forth are true to the best of his knowledge and belief.
(2) (a)  Upon the preferring of charges, the appropriate authority shall take
action immediately to determine what disposition should be made in the
interest of justice and discipline.
(b)  The accused shall be informed of the charges against him as soon as
practicable.
